Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-2911
Association; membership fee; paid into surplus.

The association may collect, at the time a policy is issued, a membership fee of not more than three hundred dollars for each bed owned or operated by the member hospital and, in case of physicians associations, ten thousand dollars for each member physician. Such fee shall be paid into the association's surplus and shall be in addition to any premium charged for insurance.

Laws 1976, LB 809, § 11.